Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1088.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 38 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART IIILEGAL HOLIDAYSChapter22. First Defenders DayCHAPTER 22FIRST DEFENDERS DAYSec.2201. Scope of chapter.2202. Observance of First Defenders Day as legal holiday.§ 2201. Scope of chapter.This chapter recognizes the contributions of the residents of <--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 this Commonwealth who defended the nation's capital during the Civil War.§ 2202. Observance of First Defenders Day as legal holiday.SECTION 1. TITLE 38 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:§ 1307. FIRST DEFENDERS DAY.(a) Legislative findings and declarations.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) On April 18, 1861, in response to President Abraham Lincoln's call for troops to defend the nation's capital following the commencement of the Civil War, five volunteer militia units from this Commonwealth were the first to arrive in Washington, DC.(2) These units became known as the "First Defenders," and their prompt response symbolized this Commonwealth's leadership and commitment to preserving the Union.(3) The First Defenders included members of the Allen Infantry (Allentown), the Logan Guards (Lewistown), the Washington Artillerists (Pottsville), the National Light Infantry (Pottsville) and the Ringgold Light Artillery (Reading).(4) The heroism, patriotism and sacrifice of these volunteer militias deserve lasting recognition by this Commonwealth.(b) Designation.--The General Assembly designates April 18 of each year as First Defenders Day in Pennsylvania.(c) Proclamation.--The Governor shall annually issue a proclamation encouraging all residents, schools and veterans' organizations to observe First Defenders Day in Pennsylvania with appropriate programs, ceremonies and activities to honor 20250SB1088PN1758 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the contributions of the First Defenders and all Pennsylvanians who served in defense of the nation during the Civil War. THE PROCLAMATION MAY NOT MANDATE A PUBLIC SCHOOL OR EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION TO PARTICIPATE IN THE OBSERVANCE.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1088PN1758 - 3 - <--12345